Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3114
Chief executive officer; qualifications.

The Governor shall appoint the chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services who shall have recognized and demonstrated knowledge and expertise in the delivery of publicly funded health and human services programs and services and administrative experience in an executive capacity. The chief executive officer shall report to the Governor and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The chief executive officer shall be subject to confirmation by a majority vote of the members of the Legislature.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 5.